Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1228.
do enact as follows:AB1228,14Section 1. 118.01 (2) (d) 2. d. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1228,2,21118.01 (2) (d) 2. d. Awareness about drug abuse, including prescription drug 2abuse, and; drug abuse prevention; fentanyl; and the use of an opioid antagonist.AB1228,23Section 2. Initial applicability.AB1228,2,44(1) This act first applies to instruction provided in the 2026-27 school year.AB1228,2,55